ro-RO: Lungimea tulpinii: Lungă; Medie; Scurtă; Altele
cs: Délka stonku: Dlouhé; Médium; Krátký; Jiné
fr: Longueur de la tige: Long; Moyen; Courte; Autre
da: Stammelængde: Lang; Medium; Kort; Andet
pl: Długość trzpienia: Długie; Środek; Krótkie; Inne
en: Stem length: Long; Medium; Short; Other
fi: Varren pituus: Pitkä; Keskimääräinen; Lyhyt; Muu
th: ความยาวก้าน: ยาว; สื่อ; สั้น; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Dolžina stebla: Dolgi; Srednji; Kratki; Drugo
hr-HR: Duljina stabljike: Duga; Srednja; Kratka; Ostalo
de: Stiellänge: Lang; Medium; Kurz; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Dĺžka stonky: Dlhý; Stredný; Krátky; Iné
pt-PT: Comprimento do caule: Comprido; Médio; Curto; Outro
nl: Stamlengte: Lang; Medium; Kort; Andere
vi: Chiều dài thân: Dài; Vừa; Ngắn; Khác
lt-LT: Stiebo ilgis: Ilgas; Vidutinis; Trumpas; Kita
sv: Stamlängd: Lång; Medium; Kort; Övrigt
es: Longitud del tallo: Largo; Medio; Corto; Otros
zh-TW: 花莖長度: 長; 媒介; 短; 其他
ko: 줄기 길이: 롱; 매체; 짧은; 기타
ru: Длина стебля: Длинный; Средний; Короткий; Другой
pt-BR: Comprimento do caule: Longo; Médio; Curto; Outro
it: Lunghezza dello stelo: Lungo; Medio; Corta; Altro
ja: 茎の長さ: ロング; 媒体; ショート; その他
zh-CN: 茎秆长度: 长; 媒介; 短; 其他
hu: Szár hossza: Hosszú; Közepes; Rövid; Egyéb
nb: Stengellengde: Lang; Middels; Kort; Annet
el: Μήκος στελέχους: Μακρύ; Μέση; Κοντό; Άλλο
bg-BG: Дължина на стъблото: Дълго; Средно; Късо; Други
tr: Kök Uzunluğu: Uzun; Orta; Kısa; Diğer